Utah statutes.
64-13-24.   Standards for staff training.

To assure the safe and professional operation of correctional programs, the department shall establish policies setting minimum standards for the basic training of all staff upon employment, and the subsequent regular training of staff. The training standards of correctional officers who are designated as peace officers shall be not less than those established by the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

